Utah statutes.
62A-4a-415.   Law enforcement interviews of children in state custody.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), the division may not consent to the interview of a child in the division's custody by a law enforcement officer, unless consent for the interview is obtained from the child's guardian ad litem.

(2)  Subsection (1) does not apply if a guardian ad litem is not appointed for the child.



Enacted by Chapter 322, 2010 General Session

